src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Masc_nom_sg
! adj following a masc. noun is lenited only if the noun is lenited

! Len tags changed 27/5/2003 EUíD
!+Sg+LenYES:^Sé #;              ! ar an fhear "bheag" - on the small man
!+Sg+LenNO:0    #;              ! BUT ar an bhfear "beag" - on the small man

!+Sg+Len:^Sé    #;              ! Lenite if noun is lenited e.g. ar an fhear "bheag" - on the small man
+Sg+Len:^Sé #;              ! Lenite if noun is lenited e.g. ar an fhear "bheag" - on the small man
+Sg:0       #;              ! Otherwise no lenition e.g. ar an bhfear "beag" - on the small man


LEXICON Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg      ! like Noun Declension 4
    
+Sg+Len:^Sé     #;              ! hata an fhir bhig - the small man's hat
                        ! a fhir bhig - O small man

LEXICON Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg      ! like Noun Declension 1

+Sg+Len:^Caol^Sé    #;              ! 



! ADJECTIVES QUALIFYING PLURAL NOUNS- COMMON TO BOTH GENDERS


LEXICON PL-A
+Pl:a       #;          ! adj is NOT lenited after a noun ending in a 
                    ! broad consonantor a vowel! E.G. na mná móra - the big women

                    ! cathair (city) is a noun with strong plurals
                    ! soilse na cathracha móra - big cities' lights

                    ! vocative: a mhná móra - O big women
LEXICON PL-A-SLENDER

+Pl+Len:a^Sé    #;          ! adj IS lenited after a noun ending in a 
                    ! slender consonantE.G. na fir bheaga - the small men


LEXICON PL-E
+Pl:e       #;          ! adj is NOT lenited after a noun ending in a 
                    ! broad consonantor a vowel

                    ! cathair (city) is a noun with strong plurals
                    ! obair na bpáistí maithe (work of the good childres)

                    ! vocative: a pháistí mhaithe - O good children
LEXICON PL-E-SLENDER

+Pl+Len:e^Sé    #;          ! adj IS lenited after a noun ending in a 
                    ! slender consonant

LEXICON PL-SLENDER

+Pl+Len:^Sé     #;          ! adj IS lenited after a noun ending in a 
                    ! slender consonant

LEXICON PL-TADA                         
+Pl:0       #;          ! bean (woman) is a noun with weak plurals
                    ! hataí na mban mór - the big womens' hats 
!------------------------------------------------------------------------------                 
LEXICON AdjBASE
!+Adj+Base:0        SéUrú;
Basic;


!************************************************************************** 
! BASE FORM
LEXICON Basic
+Adj+Base:0 #;
!+Adj+Base:^IM^hv   #;  ! e.g. go hiontach
+Adj+Base+hPref:^IM^hv  #;  ! e.g. go hiontach
+Adj+Base+Len:^IM^Sé    #;  ! e.g. ba bhreá

LEXICON SéUrú
#;
+Len:^Adj^Sé    #;
!:^Adj^Sé   #;
+Ecl:^Adj^Urú   #;
!:^Adj^Urú  #;
