src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjC
aduaidh	AdjBASE;	 ! from the north, an
amanathar	AdjBASE;	 ! the day after tomorrow;
amárach	AdjBASE;	 ! tomorrow;
aniar	AdjBASE;	 ! from the west,an ghaoth
anoir	AdjBASE;	 ! from the east,an ghaoth
anuraidh	AdjBASE;	 ! last year;
anóirthear	AdjBASE;	 ! the day after tomorrow;
aréir	AdjBASE;	 ! last night;
beathach	AdjBASE;	 ! beo ~ alive and
closamhairc	AdjBASE;	 ! áiseanna ~ audio-visual aids;
cuma	AdjBASE;	 ! is ~ liom it's
céaduair	AdjBASE;	 ! de, chéaduair first, at
doleithscéil	AdjBASE;	 ! gs. as attrib. a.
dímríoch	AdjBASE;	 ! gsm ~ feeble, helpless,
díobhlásach	AdjBASE;	 ! prodigal
dóisceanta	AdjBASE;	 ! swarthy
feillbhinn	AdjBASE;	 ! go ~ excellently, thoroughly
inné	AdjBASE;	 ! yesterday;
ionann	AdjBASE;	 ! same, identical; equal, is
lasmuigh	AdjBASE;	 ! on the outside, outdoors,
lasnairde	AdjBASE;	 ! overhead;
lastoir		AdjBASE;	 ! on the east side
lastuaidh	AdjBASE;	 ! on the north side;
miste	AdjBASE;	 ! (used with is) is
mithid	AdjBASE;	 ! (used with is) is
méanar	AdjBASE;	 ! (used with is) is
náir	AdjBASE;	 ! (used with is) is
soir	AdjBASE;	 ! to the east, eastward,
LEXICON AdjEqualVariants	
ané		AdjBASE;		! Entry: ané = inné.
anórthar		AdjBASE;		! Entry: anórthar = anóirthear.
anuaidh		AdjBASE;		! Entry: anuaidh = aduaidh.
beathaíoch		AdjBASE;		! Entry: beathaíoch = beathach. ??? Leave AdjBASE
beathúch		AdjBASE;		! Entry: beathúch = beathach. ??? Leave AdjBASE
beithíoch		AdjBASE;		! Entry: beithíoch = beathach. ^^^
caoidheamhail		AdjBASE;		! Entry: caoidheamhail = caoithiúil. ***
caoimheamhail		AdjBASE;		! Entry: caoimheamhail = caoithiúil.
clúmhail		AdjBASE;		! Entry: clúmhail, clúmhar = clúiteach. ***
cosmhail		AdjBASE;
croidheamhail		AdjBASE;		! Entry: croidheamhail = croíúil.
dligheamhail		AdjBASE;		! Entry: dligheamhail = dlíthiúil.
dlightheamhail		AdjBASE;		! Entry: dlightheamhail = dlíthiúil.
dómhadh		AdjBASE;		! Entry: dómhadh, m & a1 = dóú. ***
éinteacht		AdjBASE;		! Entry: éinteach(t) = éigin. ***
gnaoidheamhail		AdjBASE;		! Entry: gnaoidheamhail = gnaíúil.
indé		AdjBASE;		! Entry: indé = inné.
ionnamhail		AdjBASE;		! Entry: ionnamhail, ionnamhlacht = inniúil, inniúlacht.
leasnairde		AdjBASE;		! Entry: leasnairde = lasnairde.
leastoir		AdjBASE;		! Entry: leastoir, leastuaidh = lastoir, lastuaidh.
leastuaidh		AdjBASE;		! Entry: leastoir, leastuaidh = lastoir, lastuaidh.
méanair		AdjBASE;		! Entry: méanair = méanar.
méanra		AdjBASE;		! Entry: méanra = méanar.
mithe		AdjBASE;		! Entry: mithe = mithid.
LEXICON AdjVariants
amanarthar		AdjBASE;	! Headword: amanathar (a); (Var: amanarthar)
amainiris	AdjBASE;
amairinis	AdjBASE;
